Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Personal Care Assistance

205.900.
Definitions for KRS 205.905 to 205.920.

As used in KRS 205.905 to 205.920:

“Cabinet” means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

“Evaluation team” means at least three (3) individuals employed as such by a qualified agency or organization.

“Personal care assistance services” means services which are required by an adult with a severe physical disability to achieve greater physical independence and which include, but are not limited to:

Routine bodily functions, such as bowel or bladder care;

Dressing;

Housecleaning and laundry;

Preparation and consumption of food;

Moving in and out of bed;

Routine bathing;

Ambulation; and

Any other similar activity of daily living.

“Qualified agency or organization” means an agency or organization whose purpose is to provide services to severely physically disabled adults to enable them to live as independently as possible and a majority of whose governing board are consumers of these services. If no qualified agency or organization exists, an agency or organization may become a qualified provider when consumers of personal care assistance services are a majority of its advisory council.

“Secretary” means the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

“Severely physically disabled adult” means a person eighteen (18) years of age or older with permanent or temporary, recurring functional loss of two (2) or more limbs.

History.
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 168, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 229, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 405, § 61, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 416, § 15, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 336, § 7, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 426, § 235, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 6, § 25, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 288, effective June 20, 2005.

205.905.
Subsidy for personal care assistance.

The cabinet shall provide a subsidy for personal care assistance services to any adult who:

Has a severe physical disability;

Needs not less than fourteen (14) hours a week of personal care assistance services as defined by the secretary or needs an attendant at night, which services are necessary to prevent or remove the adult from inappropriate placement in an institutional setting; and

Qualifies under KRS 205.910.

The adult shall be responsible for:

Recruiting, hiring, firing and supervising the persons who provide personal care assistance services; and

Obtaining an evaluation of his eligibility for personal care services from a qualified agency or organization which employs evaluation teams to:

Determine the eligibility of the adult for personal care assistance services;

Reevaluate the adult at least biennially to determine the adult’s continuing need for services; and

Report its findings and recommendations to the cabinet.

The cabinet shall follow the recommendations of the evaluation team or shall give notice to the adult within twenty (20) days of receipt of the recommendations of its reasons for not acting on the team’s recommendations.

The cabinet may maintain a list of qualified agencies and organizations.

History.
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 168, § 2, effective July 13, 1984.

205.910.
Eligibility standard — Subsidy not income for federal law purposes — Supplements other programs.

The cabinet shall establish by regulation an eligibility standard which takes into consideration the unique economic and social needs of severely physically disabled adults.

The subsidy shall not be considered income for any purpose to the extent permitted by federal law and regulation.

This program may supplement any other programs for which the adult is eligible.

History.
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 168, § 3, effective July 13, 1984.

205.915.
Appeal of decision by aggrieved party.

Within thirty (30) days of any recommendation of any decision by the cabinet, an aggrieved party may appeal. The secretary shall appoint one (1) or more trained hearing officers to hear and decide the appeal.

Any party who is dissatisfied with the decision of the hearing officer may appeal to the appeal board. The board may on its own motion affirm, modify or set aside any decision of a hearing officer on the basis of evidence previously submitted or may direct the taking of additional evidence or may permit any party to initiate further appeals before it. The board shall notify promptly the parties of its findings and decisions.

The manner in which appeals are presented and hearings and appeals conducted shall be in accordance with regulations prescribed by the secretary for determining the rights of parties, such hearings to be conducted in a summary manner. A complete record shall be kept of all proceedings in connection with any appeal. All testimony at any hearing upon an appeal shall be recorded either stenographically or mechanically. No hearing officer or member of the board shall participate in any hearing in which he is an interested party.

History.
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 168, § 4, effective July 13, 1984.

205.920.
Regulations.

The secretary may promulgate regulations to implement KRS 205.905 to 205.915.

History.
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 168, § 5, effective July 13, 1984.

205.925.
Implementation of KRS 205.900 to 205.920 by cabinet.

The cabinet shall implement the provisions of KRS 205.900 to 205.920 on a statewide basis and shall serve at least two hundred (200) severely physically disabled adults or more as provided in the state executive branch budget bill.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 236, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2000, ch. 458, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.